North Dakota statutes. TITLE 12.1 Criminal Code
CHAPTER 12.1-14 Official Oppression — Elections — Civil Rights

12.1-14-01.
Official oppression.

A person acting or purporting to act in an official capacity or taking advantage of such actual or purported capacity is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if, knowing that his conduct is illegal, he:

Subjects another to arrest, detention, search, seizure, mistreatment, dispossession, assessment, lien, or other infringement of personal or property rights; or

Denies or impedes another in the exercise or enjoyment of any right, privilege, power, or immunity.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 116, § 14.

Cross-References.

Penalty for class A misdemeanor, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

12.1-14-02.
Interference with elections.

A person is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if, whether or not acting under color of law, the person, by force or threat of force or by economic coercion, intentionally:

Injures, intimidates, or interferes with another because the other individual is or has been voting for any candidate or issue or qualifying to vote, qualifying or campaigning as a candidate for elective office, or qualifying or acting as an election official or an election observer, in any primary, special, or general election.

Injures, intimidates, or interferes with another in order to prevent that individual or any other individual from voting for any candidate or issue or qualifying to vote, qualifying or campaigning as a candidate for elective office, or qualifying or acting as an election official or an election observer, in any primary, special, or general election.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 116, § 14; 2015, ch. 162, § 2, effective August 1, 2015.

Cross-References.

Interference with elections, offenses and penalties, see N.D.C.C. § 16.1-01-12.

Penalty for class A misdemeanor, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

12.1-14-03.
Safeguarding elections.

A person is guilty of a class A misdemeanor if, in connection with any election, he:

Makes or induces any false voting registration;

Offers, gives, or agrees to give a thing of pecuniary value to another as consideration for the recipient’s voting or withholding his vote or voting for or against any candidate or issue or for such conduct by another;

Solicits, accepts, or agrees to accept a thing of pecuniary value as consideration for conduct prohibited under subsection 1 or 2; or

Otherwise obstructs or interferes with the lawful conduct of such election or registration therefor.

As used in this section, “thing of pecuniary value” shall include alcoholic beverages, by the drink or in any other container.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 116, § 14; 1975, ch. 116, § 13.

Cross-References.

Penalty for class A misdemeanor, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

Supervision of elections, see N.D.C.C. § 16.1-01-01.

12.1-14-04.
Discrimination in public places.

A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if, whether or not acting under color of law, he, by force, or threat of force or by economic coercion, intentionally:

Injures, intimidates, or interferes with another because of his sex, race, color, religion, or national origin and because he is or has been exercising or attempting to exercise his right to full and equal enjoyment of any facility open to the public.

Injures, intimidates, or interferes with another because of his sex, race, color, religion, or national origin in order to intimidate him or any other person from exercising or attempting to exercise his right to full and equal enjoyment of any facility open to the public.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 116, § 14.

Cross-References.

Equal pay for men and women, see N.D.C.C. § 34-06.1-09.

Penalty for class B misdemeanor, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

Collateral References.

Place of public entertainment or amusement, exclusion of person (for reason other than color or race) from, 1 A.L.R.2d 1165.

Businesses or establishments falling within state civil rights statute provisions prohibiting discrimination, 87 A.L.R.2d 120.

Racial or religious discrimination in furnishing of public utilities, services, or facilities, 58 A.L.R.3d 1027.

Trailer park as place of public accomodation within meaning of state civil rights statutes, 70 A.L.R.3d 1142.

State law prohibiting sex discrimination as violated by dress or grooming requirements for customers of establishments serving food or beverages, 89 A.L.R.3d 7.

Propriety of exclusion of persons from horseracing tracks for reasons other than color or race, 90 A.L.R.3d 1361.

Exclusion of one sex from admission to or enjoyment of equal privileges in places of accommodation or entertainment as actionable sex discrimination under state law, 38 A.L.R.4th 339.

Propriety of exclusion of persons from horseracing tracks for reasons other than color or race, 64 A.L.R.5th 769.

What constitutes private club or association not otherwise open to public that is exempt from state civil rights statute, 83 A.L.R.5th 467.

12.1-14-05.
Preventing exercise of civil rights — Hindering or preventing another aiding third person to exercise civil rights.

A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if, whether or not acting under color of law, he, by force or threat of force or by economic coercion, intentionally:

Injures, intimidates, or interferes with another because he is or is about to exercise his civil rights, or because he has exercised his civil rights.

Intimidates or prevents another from aiding a third person to exercise his civil rights.

Source:

S.L. 1973, ch. 116, § 14.

Cross-References.

Penalty for class B misdemeanor, see N.D.C.C. § 12.1-32-01.

Collateral References.

Blockbusting: validity and construction of anti-blockbusting regulations as designed to prevent brokers from inducing sales of realty because of actual or rumored entry of racial group in neighborhood, 34 A.L.R.3d 1432.

Aliens: constitutionality of enactment or regulation prohibiting employment of aliens in public employment or on public works, 38 A.L.R.3d 1213.

Construction and operation of “equal opportunities clause” requiring pledge against racial discrimination in hiring under construction contract, 44 A.L.R.3d 1283.

Intoxicating liquors: validity and construction of statute or ordinance respecting employment of women in places where intoxicating liquors are sold, 46 A.L.R.3d 369.

Prohibition, under state civil rights laws, of racial discrimination in rental of privately owned residential property, 96 A.L.R.3d 497.

Enforceability of bylaw or other rule of condominium or co-operative association restricting occupancy by children, 100 A.L.R.3d 241.

What constitutes employment discrimination on basis of marital status for purposes of state civil rights laws, 44 A.L.R.4th 1044.

Accommodation requirement under state legislation forbidding job discrimination on account of handicap, 76 A.L.R.4th 310.

Handicap as job disqualification under state legislation forbidding job discrimination on account of handicap, 78 A.L.R.4th 265.

Damages and other relief under state legislation forbidding job disqualification on account of handicap, 78 A.L.R.4th 435.

Discrimination “because of handicap” or “on the basis of handicap” under state statutes prohibiting job discrimination on account of handicap, 81 A.L.R.4th 144.

What constitutes handicap under state legislation forbidding job discrimination on account of handicap, 82 A.L.R.4th 26.

Availability and Scope of Punitive Damages Under State Employment Discrimination Law,
81 A.L.R.5th 367.

Individual liability of supervisors, managers, officers or co-employees for discriminatory actions under state Civil Rights Act,Civil Rights Act, 83 A.L.R.5th 1.

Preemption of state statute, law, ordinance, or policy with respect to employment- and education-related issues involving aliens, 88 A.L.R.6th 627.